Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.235

Guardianship for dependent child—Review hearing requirements not applicable—Exception.

A dependency guardianship is not subject to the review hearing requirements of RCW 13.34.138 unless ordered by the court under RCW 13.34.232(1)(e).

[ 2000 c 122 s 31; 1981 c 195 s 6.]